Missouri, session 2026, SB1505.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 192.2400 and 192.2435, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 192.2400 and 192.2435, to read as follows:
192.2400. As used in sections 192.2400 to 192.2505,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Abuse", the infliction of physical, sexual, or
emotional injury or harm including financial exploitation by
any person, firm, or corporation and bullying;
(2) "Bullying", intimidation or harassment that causes
a reasonable person to fear for his or her physical safety
or property and may consist of physical actions including
gestures; cyberbullying; oral, electronic, or written
communication; and any threat of retaliation for reporting
of such acts;
(3) "Court", the circuit court;
(4) "Department", the department of health and senior
services;
(5) "Director", director of the department of health
and senior services or his or her designees;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1505 2
(6) "Eligible adult", a person sixty years of age or
older who is unable to protect his or her own interests or
adequately perform or obtain services which are necessary to
meet his or her essential human needs or an adult with a
disability, as defined in section 192.2005, between the ages
of eighteen and fifty-nine who is unable to protect his or
her own interests or adequately perform or obtain services
which are necessary to meet his or her essential human needs;
(7) "Home health agency", the same meaning as such
term is defined in section 197.400;
(8) "Home health agency employee", a person employed
by a home health agency;
(9) "Home health patient", an eligible adult who is
receiving services through any home health agency;
(10) "In-home services client", an eligible adult who
is receiving services in his or her private residence
through any in-home services provider agency;
(11) "In-home services employee", a person employed by
an in-home services provider agency;
(12) "In-home services provider agency", a business
entity under contract with the department or with a Medicaid
participation agreement, which employs persons to deliver
any kind of services provided for eligible adults in their
private homes;
(13) "Least restrictive environment", a physical
setting where protective services for the eligible adult and
accommodation is provided in a manner no more restrictive of
an individual's personal liberty and no more intrusive than
necessary to achieve care and treatment objectives;
(14) "Likelihood of serious physical harm", one or
more of the following:

SB 1505 3
(a) A substantial risk that physical harm to an
eligible adult will occur because of his or her failure or
inability to provide for his or her essential human needs as
evidenced by acts or behavior which has caused such harm or
which gives another person probable cause to believe that
the eligible adult will sustain such harm;
(b) A substantial risk that physical harm will be
inflicted by an eligible adult upon himself or herself, as
evidenced by recent credible threats, acts, or behavior
which has caused such harm or which places another person in
reasonable fear that the eligible adult will sustain such
harm;
(c) A substantial risk that physical harm will be
inflicted by another upon an eligible adult as evidenced by
recent acts or behavior which has caused such harm or which
gives another person probable cause to believe the eligible
adult will sustain such harm;
(d) A substantial risk that further physical harm will
occur to an eligible adult who has suffered physical injury,
neglect, sexual or emotional abuse, or other maltreatment or
wasting of his or her financial resources by another person;
(15) "Multidisciplinary adult protection team", a team
of two or more persons recognized by the department who
facilitate the identification, investigation, prosecution,
prevention, and treatment of offenses against eligible
adults and who supplement any protective services provided
by the department. In addition to department designees,
such teams may include, but shall not be limited to,
representatives from the following entities:
(a) A prosecuting attorney's office or a circuit
attorney's office;
(b) Law enforcement agencies;

SB 1505 4
(c) Medical or health care providers, including long-
term care facilities;
(d) Mental health care providers;
(e) Community-based or government agencies that, in
some capacity, participate in the prevention, investigation,
identification, treatment, or provision of care or needed
resources related to the abuse or neglect of eligible adults
and that are necessary for the review of cases;
(f) Guardians or conservators, as described in chapter
475; and
(g) Financial institutions or forensic accounting
agencies qualified to review financial matters in order to
identify financial abuse;
(16) "Neglect", the failure to provide services to an
eligible adult by any person, firm or corporation with a
legal or contractual duty to do so, when such failure
presents either an imminent danger to the health, safety, or
welfare of the client or a substantial probability that
death or serious physical harm would result;
[(16)] (17) "Protective services", services provided
100 by the state or other governmental or private organizations
101 or individuals which are necessary for the eligible adult to
102 meet his or her essential human needs.
192.2435. 1. Reports made pursuant to sections
192.2400 to 192.2470 shall be confidential and shall not be
deemed a public record and shall not be subject to the
provisions of section 109.180 or chapter 610.
2. Such reports shall be accessible for examination
and copying only to the following persons or offices, or to
their designees:
(1) The department or any person or agency designated
by the department;

SB 1505 5
(2) The attorney general;
(3) The department of mental health for persons
referred to that department;
(4) The department of social services for persons
referred to that department;
(5) Any appropriate law enforcement agency; [and]
(6) Any member of a multidisciplinary adult protection
team when acting in the member's official capacity as a
representative of a participating entity; and
[(5)] (7) The eligible adult or such adult's legal
guardian.
3. The name of the reporter shall not be disclosed
unless:
(1) It is provided to the department of mental health
for investigating reported incidents of abuse and neglect of
vulnerable persons, as defined in section 630.005; or
(2) (a) Such reporter specifically authorizes
disclosure of his name; and
[(2)] (b) The department determines that disclosure of
the name of the reporter is necessary in order to prevent
further harm to an eligible adult.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, members of a multidisciplinary adult protection
team may make available to members of the team all
information and records that are appropriate and necessary
to conduct team activities for the benefit of the eligible
adult. The case information received by members of the
multidisciplinary adult protection team shall be maintained
as confidential and any person to whom information is
released under this section is prohibited from using or
releasing the information except in the proper performance
of the person's official duties. Any member of the

SB 1505 6
multidisciplinary adult protection team may share
information that is acquired in the team member's
professional capacity with other members of the
multidisciplinary adult protection team to assist the team
in its function for the benefit of the eligible adult.
5. Any person who violates the provisions of this
section, or who permits or encourages the unauthorized
dissemination of information contained in the central
registry and in reports and records made pursuant to
sections 192.2400 to 192.2470, shall be guilty of a class A
misdemeanor.
[5.] 6. The department shall maintain a central
registry capable of receiving and maintaining reports
received in a manner that facilitates rapid access and
recall of the information reported, and of subsequent
investigations and other relevant information. The
department shall electronically record any telephone report
of suspected abuse and neglect received by the department
and such recorded reports shall be retained by the
department for a period of one year after recording.
[6.] 7. Although reports to the central registry may
be made anonymously, the department shall in all cases,
after obtaining relevant information regarding the alleged
abuse or neglect, attempt to obtain the name and address of
any person making a report.
✓